Washington statutes.
RCW 15.44.090

Collection of assessments—Lien.

All assessments shall be collected by the first dealer and deducted from the amount due the producer, and all moneys so collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the commission on or before the twentieth day of the succeeding month for the previous month's collections, and deposited by him or her in banks designated by the commission to the credit of the commission fund. If a dealer or a producer who acts as a dealer fails to remit any assessments, or fails to make deductions for assessments, such sum shall, in addition to penalties provided in this chapter, be a lien on any property owned by him or her, and shall be reported to the county auditor by the commission, supported by proper and conclusive evidence, and collected in the manner and with the same priority over other creditors as prescribed for the collection of delinquent taxes.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6060; 1979 ex.s. c 238 s 7; 1975 1st ex.s. c 136 s 4; 1961 c 11 s 15.44.090. Prior: 1959 c 163 s 12; prior: 1949 c 185 s 1, part; 1939 c 219 s 9, part; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 6266-9, part.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 238: See note following RCW 15.44.010.